Utah statutes.
32A-12-209.5.   Unlawful admittance or attempt to gain admittance by minor.
(1)  It is unlawful for a minor to gain admittance or attempt to gain
admittance to the premises of:
(a)  a tavern; or
(b)  a social club licensee, except to the extent authorized by Subsection
32A-5-107(2)(d).
(2)  A minor who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
(3)  If a minor is found by a court to have violated this section and the
violation is the minor's second or subsequent violation of this section, the
court:
(a)  shall order the minor to participate in an educational series as defined
in Section 41-6a-501; and
(b)  may order the minor to participate in a screening as defined in Section
41-6a-501.
(4) (a) When a minor who is at least 18 years old, but younger than 21 years
old, is found by a court to have violated this section, except as provided in
Section 32A-12-223, the court hearing the case shall suspend the minor's
driving privileges under Section 53-3-219.
(b)  Notwithstanding the provision in Subsection (4)(a), the court may reduce
the suspension period required under Section 53-3-219 if:
(i)  the violation is the minor's first violation of this section; and
(ii)  the minor completes an educational series as defined in Section
41-6a-501.
(5)  When a minor who is at least 13 years old, but younger than 18 years old,
is found by a court to have violated this section, Section 78A-6-606 applies
to the violation.
(6)  When a court issues an order suspending a person's driving privileges for
a violation of this section, the Driver License Division shall suspend the
person's license under Section 53-3-219.
(7)  When the Department of Public Safety receives the arrest or conviction
record of a person for a driving offense committed while the person's license
is suspended pursuant to this section, the Department of Public Safety shall
extend the suspension for an additional like period of time.
